Georgia, session 2025_26, HB482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 6 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding superior courts, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"15-6-37.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any judicial circuit of this state with 15
or more judges of the superior court, as provided for in Code Section 15-6-2, the governing
authorities of the counties that make up such circuit are authorized to provide funding for
up to five judicial officers to serve in the superior courts of such circuit.
H. B. 482
- 1 -

LC 47 3316
(b) In the event that a county or counties provide funding for judicial officers as provided
for in subsection (a) of this Code section, the chief judge of the circuit, after consulting
with a majority of the superior court judges in such circuit, may appoint qualified
individuals as judicial officers in the superior courts of such circuit. Judicial officers shall
have all of the qualifications provided for in Code Section 15-6-4 for superior court judges;
provided, however, that such judicial officers shall not be elected.
(c) Judicial officers appointed pursuant to this Code section shall have all powers and
duties of a judge of the superior court; provided, however, that judicial officers shall not
preside over any case or matter related to a serious violent felony as such term is defined
in Code Section 17-10-6.1, and provided, further, that the chief judge of a circuit, after
consulting with a majority of the superior court judges in such circuit, may place such
additional limitations on the use of such judicial officers in the circuit.
(d) Judicial officers appointed pursuant to this Code section shall be appointed to terms
not to exceed two years; provided, however, that a judicial officer may be reappointed to
succeed himself or herself.
(e) Judicial officers appointed pursuant to this Code section shall be employees of the
county or counties that make up the judicial circuit in which they are appointed. Such
judicial officers shall not be considered state employees for any reason, and the counties
that make up such circuit shall be responsible for the compensation, benefits, travel, and
other expenses for such judicial officers."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 482
- 2 -